Hawaii statutes.
§§205-5.1 to 205-5.3 REPEALED. L 2012,
c 97, §§9 to 11.

Note

The repeal of §§205-5.1 to 205-5.3 shall not affect any
geothermal resources producer who operates in the area of a subzone on April
30, 2012, and the producer shall continue to operate in accordance with the
lease with the board of land and natural resources. L 2012, c 97, §12.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next